California, session 20252026, AB2726.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1279.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:1279.5. (a) In addition to and notwithstanding Section 1279, the county board of education may declare county office of education-owned technology to be surplus technology property and the county superintendent of schools may dispose of that surplus technology property by any of the following methods, if authorized by a policy adopted by the county board of education:(1) Sale by public auction, including online auction.(2) Sale by sealed bid.(3) Sale or transfer through a structured trade-in or buyback program with a vendor, manufacturer, or other third-party purchaser, including where the value of the surplus technology is applied as a credit against the purchase price or lease payments for replacement technology.(4) Negotiated sale to a public agency, nonprofit organization, or private entity, if the county board of education determines that the negotiated sale is in the best interest of the county office of education and is reasonably calculated to yield fair market value under the circumstances.(5) Donation to a public agency or nonprofit public benefit corporation organized under the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code).(b) Before disposing of surplus technology property pursuant to this section, the county board of education shall adopt policies and procedures that, at a minimum, address all of the following:(1) A process for determining that technology is no longer required for school purposes, is to be disposed of for the purpose of replacement, or is unsatisfactory or not suitable for school use.(2) Reasonable methods to ensure competition or market testing.(3) Compliance with all applicable state and federal requirements for the protection of pupil and employee data, including secure data deletion, device wiping, and verification of destruction or sanitization before transferring technology to a third party.(4) Procedures to ensure that technology acquired in whole or in part with state or federal categorical funds is disposed of in a manner consistent with conditions attached to those funds.(c) To the extent practicable, a county superintendent of schools shall structure the disposition of surplus technology in a manner that does both of the following:(1) Maximizes the net proceeds or value returned to the county office of education, including through trade-in or buyback arrangements.(2) Minimizes electronic waste and promotes environmentally responsible recycling, refurbishment, and reuse.(d) This section does not limit any existing authority for the disposition of personal property pursuant to this article.(e) For purposes of this section, “technology” means any electronic, digital, or electromechanical equipment, system, or device, and any associated software, firmware, service, or license, acquired primarily for instructional, administrative, operational, public safety, or facilities use by a county office of education, including, but not limited to, computers, servers, network and telecommunications equipment, mobile devices, audiovisual and display systems, projection equipment, surveillance and security systems, instructional and simulation equipment, medical and laboratory devices, and related peripherals and accessories.SEC. 2. Section 17549.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:17549.5. (a) In addition to and notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the governing board of a school district may declare school district-owned technology to be surplus technology property, and the school district may dispose of that surplus technology property by any of the following methods, if authorized by a policy adopted by the governing board of the school district:(1) Sale by public auction, including online auction.(2) Sale by sealed bid.(3) Sale or transfer through a structured trade-in or buyback program with a vendor, manufacturer, or other third-party purchaser, including where the value of the surplus technology is applied as a credit against the purchase price or lease payments for replacement technology.(4) Negotiated sale to a public agency, nonprofit organization, or private entity, if the governing board of the school district determines that the negotiated sale is in the best interest of the school district and is reasonably calculated to yield fair market value under the circumstances.(5) Donation to a public agency or nonprofit public benefit corporation organized under the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code).(b) Before disposing of surplus technology property pursuant to this section, the governing board of the school district shall adopt policies and procedures that, at a minimum, address all of the following:(1) A process for determining that technology is no longer required for school purposes, is to be disposed of for the purpose of replacement, or is unsatisfactory or not suitable for school use.(2) Reasonable methods to ensure competition or market testing.(3) Compliance with all applicable state and federal requirements for the protection of pupil and employee data, including secure data deletion, device wiping, and verification of destruction or sanitization before transferring technology to a third party.(4) Procedures to ensure that technology acquired in whole or in part with state or federal categorical funds is disposed of in a manner consistent with conditions attached to those funds.(c) To the extent practicable, a school district shall structure the disposition of surplus technology in a manner that does both of the following:(1) Maximizes the net proceeds or value returned to the school district, including through trade-in or buyback arrangements.(2) Minimizes electronic waste and promotes environmentally responsible recycling, refurbishment, and reuse.(d) This section does not limit any existing authority for the disposition of personal property pursuant to this article.(e) For purposes of this section, “technology” means any electronic, digital, or electromechanical equipment, system, or device, and any associated software, firmware, service, or license, acquired primarily for instructional, administrative, operational, public safety, or facilities use by a school district, including, but not limited to, computers, servers, network and telecommunications equipment, mobile devices, audiovisual and display systems, projection equipment, surveillance and security systems, instructional and simulation equipment, medical and laboratory devices, and related peripherals and accessories.SEC. 3. Section 81455.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:81455.5. (a) In addition to and notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the governing board of a community college district may declare community college district-owned technology to be surplus technology property and the community college district may dispose of that surplus technology property by any of the following methods, if authorized by a policy adopted by the governing board of the community college district:(1) Sale by public auction, including online auction.(2) Sale by sealed bid.(3) Sale or transfer through a structured trade-in or buyback program with a vendor, manufacturer, or other third-party purchaser, including where the value of the surplus technology is applied as a credit against the purchase price or lease payments for replacement technology.(4) Negotiated sale to a public agency, nonprofit organization, or private entity, if the governing board of the community college district determines that the negotiated sale is in the best interest of the community college district and is reasonably calculated to yield fair market value under the circumstances.(b) Before disposing of surplus technology property pursuant to this section, the governing board of the community college district shall adopt policies and procedures that, at a minimum, address all of the following:(1) A process for determining that technology is no longer required for school purposes, is to be disposed of for the purpose of replacement, or is unsatisfactory or not suitable for community college use.(2) Reasonable methods to ensure competition or market testing.(3) Compliance with all applicable state and federal requirements for the protection of student and employee data, including secure data deletion, device wiping, and verification of destruction or sanitization before transferring technology to a third party.(4) Procedures to ensure that technology acquired in whole or in part with state or federal categorical funds is disposed of in a manner consistent with conditions attached to those funds.(5) Donation to a public agency or nonprofit public benefit corporation organized under the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code).(c) To the extent practicable, a community college district shall structure the disposition of surplus technology in a manner that does both of the following:(1) Maximizes the net proceeds or value returned to the community college district, including through trade-in or buyback arrangements.(2) Minimizes electronic waste and promotes environmentally responsible recycling, refurbishment, and reuse.(d) This section does not limit any existing authority for the disposition of personal property pursuant to this article.(e) For purposes of this section, “technology” means any electronic, digital, or electromechanical equipment, system, or device, and any associated software, firmware, service, or license, acquired primarily for instructional, administrative, operational, public safety, or facilities use by a community college district, including, but not limited to, computers, servers, network and telecommunications equipment, mobile devices, audiovisual and display systems, projection equipment, surveillance and security systems, instructional and simulation equipment, medical and laboratory devices, and related peripherals and accessories.